Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.260

Receiver's disposition of property—Sales free and clear.

(1) The receiver, with the court's approval after notice and a hearing, may use, sell, or lease estate property other than in the ordinary course of business. Except in the case of a leasehold estate with a remaining term of less than two years or a vendor's interest in a real estate contract, estate property consisting of real property may not be sold by a custodial receiver other than in the ordinary course of business.

(2) The court may order that a general receiver's sale of estate property either (a) under subsection (1) of this section, or (b) consisting of real property which the debtor intended to sell in its ordinary course of business be effected free and clear of liens and of all rights of redemption, whether or not the sale will generate proceeds sufficient to fully satisfy all claims secured by the property, unless either:

(i) The property is real property used principally in the production of crops, livestock, or aquaculture, or the property is a homestead under RCW 6.13.010(1), and the owner of the property has not consented to the sale following the appointment of the receiver; or

(ii) The owner of the property or a creditor with an interest in the property serves and files a timely opposition to the receiver's sale, and the court determines that the amount likely to be realized by the objecting person from the receiver's sale is less than the person would realize within a reasonable time in the absence of the receiver's sale.

Upon any sale free and clear of liens authorized by this section, all security interests and other liens encumbering the property conveyed transfer and attach to the proceeds of the sale, net of reasonable expenses incurred in the disposition of the property, in the same order, priority, and validity as the liens had with respect to the property immediately before the conveyance. The court may authorize the receiver at the time of sale to satisfy, in whole or in part, any allowed claim secured by the property out of the proceeds of its sale if the interest of any other creditor having a lien against the proceeds of the sale would not thereby be impaired.

(3) At a public sale of property under subsection (1) of this section, a creditor with an allowed claim secured by a lien against the property to be sold may bid at the sale of the property. A secured creditor who purchases the property from a receiver may offset against the purchase price its allowed secured claim against the property, provided that the secured creditor tenders cash sufficient to satisfy in full all secured claims payable out of the proceeds of sale having priority over the secured creditor's secured claim. If the lien or the claim it secures is the subject of a bona fide dispute, the court may order the holder of the claim to provide the receiver with adequate security to assure full payment of the purchase price in the event the lien, the claim, or any part thereof is determined to be invalid or unenforceable.

(4) If estate property includes an interest as a co-owner of property, the receiver shall have the rights and powers of a co-owner afforded by applicable state or federal law, including but not limited to any rights of partition.

(5) The reversal or modification on appeal of an authorization to sell or lease estate property under this section does not affect the validity of a sale or lease under that authorization to an entity that purchased or leased the property in good faith, whether or not the entity knew of the pendency of the appeal, unless the authorization and sale or lease were stayed pending the appeal.

[ 2011 c 34 s 9; 2004 c 165 s 28.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.